Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Electronic Health Information Exchange System.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent applicable to the electronic health information exchange system established in this article, see § 1, ch. 24, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.23.300.
Creation of health information exchange system.

The department shall establish and implement a statewide electronic health information exchange system and ensure the interoperability and compliance of the system with state and federal specifications and protocols for exchanging health records and data.

The system established under this section must

include infrastructure planning that involves

the designation by the commissioner of a qualified entity or combination of qualified entities in the state that

has an advisory or governing body made up of health system stakeholders that include members identified under (d) of this section;

applies for available federal and state funding for planning and implementation of the system authorized by the commissioner;

submits an annual budget for approval of the commissioner;

complies with nondiscrimination and conflict of interest policies;

meets and complies with federal and state health information policies and standards;

provides cost and cost saving data associated with the development and use of the system to the department;

the development of statewide infrastructure to support the electronic health information exchange system established under this section and to connect electronic health records to the infrastructure;

the development of a statewide technology plan, with the participation of identified stakeholders, to promote the implementation and sustained use by public and private health care payors and providers of electronic health records and the system established under this section in order to ensure interoperability among government-operated health information systems and other public and private health information and reporting systems;

the development of policies and standards, consistent with federal and state law, to safeguard the privacy and security of health information;

the development of a training and workforce development plan for implementing and serving the system;

an estimate of costs of the hardware, software, services, and support needed to implement and maintain the technical infrastructure; and

include implementation measures that

provide for installation and training on the use of the system;

set out a plan to encourage health care provider, payor, and patient use of electronic records over a sustained period of time;

provide support to providers for workflow redesign, quality improvement, and care management services;

provide for participation by all identified stakeholders in the planning and implementation of the system;

comply with federal and state health information policies; and

provide for periodic evaluation and improvement of the system.

The department may enter into contracts, seek and accept available federal and private funds and equipment, and adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

The designee under (b)(1)(A) of this section may be a private for-profit or nonprofit entity or entities under contract with the state. The advisory or governing body of the designee must include

the commissioner;

eight other individuals, each of whom represents one of the following interests:

hospitals and nursing home facilities;

private medical care providers;

community-based primary care providers;

federal health care providers;

Alaska tribal health organizations;

health insurers;

health care consumers;

employers or businesses; and

two nonvoting liaison members who shall serve to enhance communication and collaboration between the designee and both the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska and the commission established in the governor’s office to review health care policy.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 2009)

Sec. 18.23.305.
Department; duties.

In carrying out its duties under AS

18.23.300

, the department shall

in accordance with federal recommendations, determine the manner in which the system is developed and operated;

provide oversight and technical assistance needed for planning and implementing the system;

authorize and facilitate applications for available federal funding for planning and implementing the system;

ensure compliance with applicable federal and state health information policies and standards;

ensure compliance with federal and state law and standards that safeguard the privacy and security of health information;

ensure that the health information exchange system becomes self-sustaining through a combination of user fees and other private and public funding sources.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 2009)

Sec. 18.23.310.
Confidentiality and security of information.

The department shall establish appropriate security standards to protect the transmission and receipt of individually identifiable information contained in the system established under AS

18.23.300

. The standards must

include controls over access to and collection, organization, and maintenance of records and data that protect the confidentiality of the individual who is the subject of a health record;

include a secure and traceable electronic audit system for identifying access points and trails;

meet the most stringent applicable federal or state privacy law governing the protection of the information contained in the system.

A person may not release or publish individually identifying health information from the system for purposes unrelated to the treatment or billing of the patient who is the subject of the information. Use or distribution of the information for a marketing purpose is strictly prohibited.

The department shall establish procedures for a patient who is the subject of a health record contained in the system

to opt out of the system;

to consent to the distribution of the patient’s records contained in the system;

to be notified of a violation of the confidentiality provisions required under this section;

on request to the department, to view an audit report created under this section for the purpose of monitoring access to the patient’s records.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, “identifying” was substituted for “indentifying” in subsection (b) to correct a manifest error in sec. 2, ch. 24, SLA 2009.

Sec. 18.23.315.
Health information exchange system report to the legislature.

The department shall provide to the legislature, on or before December 31 of each year, an annual report on the progress of the health information exchange system in the state, including a specific set of recommendations for long-term participation and financial support by the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 2009)

Sec. 18.23.320.
Contract conditions.

A contract entered into to carry out the purposes of AS

18.23.300

must require that the contractor meet applicable federal and state requirements for protecting health information privacy and security and nationally recognized standards for interoperability of health information technology.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 2009)

Sec. 18.23.325.
Definitions.

In AS

18.23.300

—

18.23.325

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“system” means the statewide electronic health information exchange system established under AS

18.23.300

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 2009)